Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1904.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 17-116.23 of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Any person receiving benefits from the Teachers' Retirement
System of Oklahoma as of June 30, 2025, who continues to receive
benefits on or after July 1, 2025, and whose maximum compensation
level was limited to Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) for
purposes of the member's retirement benefit computation at the time
of retirement shall receive a fifty-percent (50%) increase in said
benefits beginning in July 2025.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
Req. No. 13668 Page 1

RBH No. 13668
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-13668 CMA 05/06/25


















Req. No. 13668 Page 2